Illinois, session 104th, SB47.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Data Broker Registry Fund. 8    Section 10. The Personal Information Protection Act is 9amended by adding Section 55 as follows: 10    (815 ILCS 530/55 new)11    Sec. 55. Data broker registry.12    (a) As used in this Section, "data broker" means a 13business that knowingly collects and sells to third parties 14the personal information of a consumer with whom the business 15does not have a direct relationship. "Data broker" does not 16include:17        (1) an entity to the extent that it is covered by the 18    federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681 et 19    seq.); and20        (2) an entity to the extent that it is covered by the 21    Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Public Law 106-102) and its   SB0047- 2 -LRB104 03755 SPS 13779 b1    implementing regulations.2    (b) Annually, on or before January 31, a data broker 3operating in this State shall register with the Attorney 4General.5    (c) In registering with the Attorney General, a data 6broker shall pay a registration fee in an amount determined by 7the Attorney General, not to exceed the reasonable costs of 8establishing and maintaining the informational Internet 9website described in Section 60. A data broker shall also 10provide the following information:11        (1) the name of the data broker and its primary 12    physical, email, and Internet website addresses;13        (2) whether the data broker collects the personal 14    information of minors;15        (3) whether the data broker collects consumers' 16    precise geolocation;17        (4) whether the data broker collects consumers' 18    reproductive health care data;19        (5) a link to a page on the data broker's Internet 20    website that does not make use of any dark patterns;21        (6) whether, and to what extent, the data broker or 22    any of its subsidiaries is regulated by any of the 23    following: 24            (A) the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 25        U.S.C. 1681 et seq.); and26            (B) the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Public Law   SB0047- 3 -LRB104 03755 SPS 13779 b1        106-102) and its implementing regulations; and2        (7) any additional information or explanation the data 3    broker chooses to provide concerning its data collection 4    practices.5    (d) The Attorney General shall create a page on its 6Internet website where the registration information provided 7in subsection (c) shall be made accessible to the public.8    (e) A data broker that fails to register as required by 9this Section shall be liable for civil penalties and costs in 10an action brought by the Attorney General as follows:11        (1) a civil penalty of $200 for each day the data 12    broker fails to register as required by this Section;13        (2) an amount equal to the fees that were due during 14    the period it failed to register; and15        (3) expenses incurred by the Attorney General in the 16    investigation and administration of the action as the 17    court deems appropriate.18    (f) All moneys received by the Attorney General under this 19Section shall be deposited into the Data Broker Registry Fund, 20a special fund created in the State treasury, and shall be 21used, subject to appropriation and as directed by the Attorney 22General, to offset all reasonable costs of enforcing the 23registration requirements described in subsection (c) and 24establishing and maintaining the Internet website in 25subsection (d).